Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 5. Electronic Signatures.

Secs. 09.25.500 — 09.25.520.
Purposes and construction; electronic records and signatures; definitions. [Repealed, § 2 ch 110 SLA 2004. For current provisions, see AS 09.80.]

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 5
ch. 110, SLA 2004, “[a] rule of law that is satisfied under [former] AS 09.25.510(a), before July 1, 2004, by an electronic record executed or adopted with an electronic signature remains satisfied on and after July 1, 2004, notwithstanding the repeal of
AS 09.25.510 by sec. 2 of this Act.”

Cross references. —

For present provisions regarding electronic records and electronic signatures, see the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, AS

09.80.010

—

09.80.195

.